Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.905

Application—2018 c 62.

The requirements of chapter 62, Laws of 2018 do not apply to any person doing business under, and as permitted by, any law of this state or of the United States relating to banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan or building and loan associations, or credit unions.

[ 2018 c 62 s 20.]